Utah statutes.
67-16-12.   Penalties for violation -- Removal from office or dismissal from employment.

In addition to any penalty contained in any other provision of law:

(1)  any public officer or public employee who knowingly and intentionally violates this chapter, with the exception of Sections 67-16-6 and 67-16-7, shall be dismissed from employment or removed from office as provided by law, rule, or policy within the agency; and

(2)  any public officer, public employee, or person who knowingly and intentionally violates this chapter, with the exception of Sections 67-16-6 and 67-16-7, shall be punished as follows:

(a)  as a felony of the second degree if the total value of the compensation, conflict of interest, or assistance exceeds $1,000;

(b)  as a felony of the third degree if:

(i)  the total value of the compensation, conflict of interest, or assistance is more than $250 but not more than $1,000; or

(ii)  the public officer or public employee has been twice before convicted of violation of this chapter and the value of the conflict of interest, compensation, or assistance was $250 or less;

(c)  as a class A misdemeanor if the value of the compensation or assistance was more than $100 but does not exceed $250; or

(d)  as a class B misdemeanor if the value of the compensation or assistance was $100 or less.

